Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.040

Federally insured or secured loans, securities, etc.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds:

(1) In such loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit as are eligible for insurance by the Federal Housing Administrator, and may obtain such insurance.

(2) In such loans secured by mortgage on real property as the Federal Housing Administrator insures or makes a commitment to insure, and may obtain such insurance.

(3) In such other loans or contracts or advances of credit as are insured or guaranteed or which are covered by a repurchase agreement in whole or in part by the United States or through any corporation, administrator, agency or instrumentality which is or hereafter may be created by the United States, and may obtain such insurance or guarantee.

(4) In capital stock, notes, bonds, debentures, or other such obligations of any national mortgage association.

(5) In such loans as are secured by contracts of the United States or any agency or department thereof assigned under the "Assignment of Claims Act of 1940," approved October 9, 1940, and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, and may participate with others in such loans.

(6) In notes or bonds secured by mortgages issued under sections 500 to 505, inclusive, of Title III of the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944 (Public Law 346, 78th congress), and any amendments thereto, and the regulations, orders or rulings promulgated thereunder.

No law of this state prescribing the nature, amount, or form of security or requiring security or prescribing or limiting interest rates or prescribing or limiting the term, shall be deemed to apply to loans, contracts, advances of credit or purchases made pursuant to the foregoing subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6).

[ 1963 c 176 s 5; 1955 c 13 s 32.20.040. Prior: 1945 c 228 s 1; 1941 c 15 s 6; 1939 c 33 s 1; 1935 c 10 s 1; 1929 c 74 s 3a; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3381-3a.]